Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 4. Injury to Livestock by Railroads.

Sec. 42.30.150.
Liability of railroad for injury to or death of livestock.

A person or the lessee or agent of a person owning or operating a railroad in the state is liable for the value of or injury to a horse, mule, colt, cow, bull, calf, hog, sheep, or other domesticated animal killed or injured upon or near an unfenced track of a railroad in the state, whenever the death or injury is caused by a moving train, engine, or car upon a track.

History.

(§ 49-3-31 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 42.30.160.
When railroad track considered fenced.

A railroad track is not fenced within the meaning of AS

42.30.150

—

42.30.190

unless the track is guarded against the entrance of the livestock on either side and not more than 100 feet distant from the track by a fence constructed as required by law. Complete natural defenses against the entrance of stock, such as natural walls or deep ditches, are lawful fences within the meaning of AS

42.30.150

—

42.30.190

when they form, in connection with other legal fences, a continuous guard and defense against the entrance of livestock upon the track.

History.

(§ 49-3-32 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

For provisions related to fences generally, see AS 03.30; for controlled livestock districts, see AS 03.35.

Sec. 42.30.170.
Notice and filing of killing or injury.

Whenever livestock mentioned in AS

42.30.150

is killed or injured upon an unfenced railroad track, the person owning or operating the railroad, or that person’s lessee or agent, or an authorized agent or employee, shall immediately have a notice of killing or injury filed by filing a concise description of the animal killed or injured, including brand, earmark, or other marks of ownership with the railroad agents at the two extremities of the section on which the killing or injury took place.
If the animal is injured, the notice must describe the nature of the injury.
The description shall be open to inspection at all reasonable hours of each week day for one month after the killing or injury.

History.

(§ 49-3-33 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 42.30.180.
Penalty for failure to file notice.

A person who neglects or fails to file or have filed the notice provided for in AS

42.30.170

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $200 for each offense.

History.

(§ 49-3-34 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 42.30.190.
Action for killing or injury.

In an action for the recovery of the value of livestock referred to in AS

42.30.150

, proof of death or injury is conclusive evidence of negligence upon the part of the person or the person’s lessee or agent owning or operating the railroad.
Contributory negligence on the part of the plaintiff in the action is a defense. However, allowing stock to run at large upon common unfenced range or upon enclosed land owned or in possession of the owner is not contributory negligence.
Proof of wilful intent on the part of the plaintiff to procure the death or injury of stock defeats the recovery of damages for death or injury.

History.

(§ 49-3-35 ACLA 1949)